src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX X 0 адиганми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиган-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиган-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганим [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганим-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганиммикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганим-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимиз [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимизми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимиздир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимиздир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимизмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганинг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганинг-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингиз [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингизми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингиздир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингиздир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингизмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганингиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигани [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганими [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигани-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигани-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлар [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлар-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлармикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларим [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларим-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлариммикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларим-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимиз [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимизми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимиздир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимиздир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимизмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларинг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларинг-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингиз [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингизми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингиздир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингиздир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингизмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларингиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлари [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларими [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлари-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлари-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адек [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адай [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ани [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ага [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ада [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандек [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандай [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганни [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганнинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганга [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганда [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардек [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардай [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларни [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларнинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларга [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларда [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аними [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ани-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ани-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 агами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 агадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ага-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 агадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 агамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ага-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аданми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адандир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адан-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ададир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ада-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ададир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 ада-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганними [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганнидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганни-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигангами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигангадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганга-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигангадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигангамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганданми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандандир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандан-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганда-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адигандамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларними [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларнидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларни-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларгами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларгадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларга-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларгадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларданми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардандир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардан-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларда-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганлардамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 адиганларда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анинг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анингдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 анинг-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимни [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимними [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимни-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнинг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнингдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимнинг-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимга [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимгами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимгадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимга-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимгадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимдан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимданми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимдандир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимдан-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимдандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимдан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимда [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимдами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимдадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимда-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимдадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимдамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аимда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аини [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аиними [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аинидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аини-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аинидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аинимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аини-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аининг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аинингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аинингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аининг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
