src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
авжлан/X
ағдариш/X
ажабсин/X
азотла/X
айқир/X
айрилтир/X
аккредитацияла/X
алангалантир/X
алжиш/X
алмаштириш/X
ангровлан/X
анқовсира/X
арзи/X
арралан/X
асирлан/X
асфальтлаттир/X
ахтала/X
аччиқлантир/X
бадирла/X
байрамлаш/X
бальзамла/X
баробарлаштирил/X
баҳолан/X
бежа/X
бездирил/X
бекучлан/X
беобрўлан/X
бесарлан/X
бефаросатлан/X
бидирлаш/X
билавер/X
билқилла/X
бирхиллаштир/X
бичтир/X
бойбўйла/X
болғалаш/X
бороналан/X
ботқоқлан/X
бошсизлантир/X
буғлантирил/X
буздир/X
бўйсун/X
буктир/X
булғантир/X
бўралан/X
буриштир/X
бурролаш/X
бутлаш/X
бўшатқиз/X
бюджетлаштир/X
вазелинла/X
ванғиллат/X
ваҳмалан/X
визиллат/X
возиллат/X
гажаклан/X
гангиракла/X
гапиртирил/X
гидратла/X
гипслан/X
гувулла/X
гумонсиран/X
гуркура/X
ғажила/X
ғарамлат/X
ғизиллат/X
ғимирси/X
ғирчилла/X
ғудулла/X
ғўнғирла/X
дадиллан/X
далиллан/X
даранғла/X
дастурла/X
декларациялан/X
диверсификациялан/X
дилдираш/X
диркилла/X
дозалаштир/X
дугоналаш/X
дўл/X
дўпирла/X
дурустлаш/X
ёвуқлан/X
ёғсират/X
ёзилтир/X
ёқалаш/X
елдиртир/X
елпиллат/X
ёнбос/X
ёндириш/X
ёри/X
етавер/X
еткизил/X
ечиш/X
жаврайвер/X
жазолат/X
жаранглат/X
жиддийлаштирил/X
жилдират/X
жимиқ/X
жипслаштирил/X
жойлаштириш/X
жузла/X
жуфтала/X
замбилла/X
зарарсизлантирил/X
зерик/X
зирала/X
зоналаштирил/X
зумла/X
ивиш/X
излайвер/X
иккилан/X
илға/X
илиқиш/X
имиллаш/X
ингрантир/X
индустрлаш/X
интеграцияла/X
ирғай/X
ирит/X
исла/X
итартир/X
ихчамлаштирил/X
ичкир/X
ишлатиш/X
иярт/X
йиғлат/X
йиринглат/X
йўқла/X
йўллаттир/X
йўталтир/X
калавалат/X
ками/X
кариллат/X
кафанла/X
кеккай/X
кемир/X
керк/X
кетаёз/X
кечириш/X
кийин/X
киритил/X
кифтла/X
клонлаштир/X
койи/X
конвейерлаштир/X
кооперациялаш/X
кристаллаштир/X
куйдиртир/X
кўкартириш/X
кўлмакла/X
кўн/X
кўпиклан/X
куратил/X
курмакла/X
куткила/X
кўчиртир/X
қаватлан/X
қадрла/X
қайдла/X
қайрилтир/X
қаққайтир/X
қалдира/X
қамчила/X
қаппай/X
қаричла/X
қатла/X
қатъийлаш/X
қидир/X
қизиқ/X
қийқангла/X
қийрат/X
қилпангла/X
қинғирлан/X
қировлан/X
қисқар/X
қичи/X
қовур/X
қоқиниш/X
қонат/X
қонунлаштир/X
қоралаш/X
қочил/X
қувиш/X
қўзғалтир/X
қуйиш/X
қулқулла/X
қулунлаш/X
қўндириш/X
қўрға/X
қуриштир/X
қуруқлан/X
қутқазиш/X
қўшил/X
лаинлаш/X
легаллаштир/X
линтерлан/X
лойқалантир/X
лослан/X
магнитсизлаштир/X
мазалан/X
мактублаш/X
марказлаштир/X
маҳаллийлаштир/X
маъносизлан/X
механизациялантир/X
мижғи/X
милдира/X
мингиздир/X
митала/X
мойла/X
монтажла/X
мувофиқлаштир/X
мужмаллаштир/X
мўлай/X
мумиёлан/X
мураккаблаштир/X
муҳофазала/X
муяссарлан/X
наминқира/X
натураллаштирил/X
нейтраллаш/X
ниқта/X
нишонлаш/X
нолит/X
нормаллаш/X
нўноқлаш/X
оббола/X
обрўлан/X
овуш/X
оғринтир/X
ожизлан/X
ойдинлаш/X
оқла/X
олдинлаштир/X
олқишлан/X
оммалаштирил/X
оптималлаштир/X
орқалаш/X
осил/X
отлан/X
оҳҳолаш/X
оша/X
ошлан/X
пақирла/X
парафинла/X
партиллат/X
пастлаштир/X
пачақлан/X
пиёдалаш/X
пилтала/X
писиллат/X
пичирлат/X
пиширтир/X
пойкўпла/X
попирла/X
пресслан/X
пуллат/X
пуфпуфла/X
равшанлаштир/X
рақамлан/X
расола/X
ризолаш/X
саёзлаш/X
саломлаш/X
сарала/X
сачра/X
сенлаш/X
сиғдирил/X
сийпалан/X
силки/X
синдир/X
сирла/X
соғ/X
солиштир/X
стандартлаштир/X
судраттир/X
сўкиниш/X
сумбала/X
сўрдиртир/X
сустлан/X
табақалан/X
такмилла/X
тақил/X
тамаддилан/X
танла/X
тарашлат/X
тартибсизлаш/X
тахлат/X
ташлаш/X
теваракла/X
текислаш/X
тепкилат/X
тетиклаштир/X
тийдир/X
тиқирлат/X
тимталаш/X
типирлаш/X
тиркаштир/X
титкилаш/X
тозалаш/X
томирлаш/X
торсилла/X
тўгараклан/X
туёқла/X
тўйғаз/X
тўқиттир/X
тўлдиртир/X
тўнкарил/X
турғизил/X
тўсил/X
туфлан/X
увалат/X
уддалаш/X
узиш/X
уйилтир/X
ўкинтир/X
ўқталиш/X
улуғлаш/X
ўнгар/X
ўпирил/X
урдиртир/X
ўрнаштирил/X
ўтил/X
ўтмаслан/X
учирил/X
ушоқла/X
фаҳмлан/X
хайрлаш/X
хахолаш/X
хирпалан/X
хослаштир/X
хўрлаш/X
ҳазиллаш/X
ҳалолла/X
ҳаяжонлантир/X
ҳиҳила/X
ҳўлла/X
цементлаш/X
чайнал/X
чақчайтир/X
чангалла/X
чарлаш/X
чекилтир/X
чигаллаш/X
чийчийлаш/X
чимит/X
чирма/X
чопиш/X
чувулла/X
чўккалан/X
чўллан/X
чўчинқира/X
шакарлан/X
шанғи/X
шатилла/X
шиқирла/X
шинғиллаш/X
шиш/X
шохлатил/X
шумшайиш/X
эз/X
электрлаш/X
энсизлаш/X
эсла/X
ювдиртир/X
юқорилаш/X
юпантир/X
яганала/X
яланғочлан/X
яматтир/X
яримлат/X
яша/X
